Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5269.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "veteran abuse reporting act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "County department of veterans' affairs" means a county department of veterans' affairs created under 1953 PA 192, MCL 35.621 to 35.624. (b) "Report of abuse" means a report of suspected or alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation, as those terms are defined in section 11 of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.11, concerning a veteran. (c) "Veteran" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1965 PA 190, MCL 35.61. Sec. 5. (1) If a state department, a state or local law enforcement agency, or a prosecutor receives a report of abuse, the state department, state or local law enforcement agency, or prosecutor shall notify 1 of the following not later than 24 hours after receiving the report of abuse: (a) The county department of veterans' affairs of the county in which the report of abuse occurred. (b) If the county in which the report of abuse occurred has not created a county department of veterans' affairs, the county board of commissioners. (2) The notice provided under subsection (1) must include the name of the veteran and a description of the suspected or alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation contained in the report of abuse. If possible, the notice must include the veteran's age and the name and address of the veteran's guardian or next of kin. The notice must include other available information that may establish the cause of the suspected or alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation and the manner in which the suspected or alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation occurred or is occurring. Sec. 7. If a county department of veterans' affairs or county board of commissioners receives a notice of a report of abuse under section 5, the county department of veterans' affairs or county board of commissioners shall do both of the following: (a) Contact the veteran identified in the report of abuse directly or contact the veteran's legal guardian or an individual with power of attorney for the veteran. (b) Refer the veteran to services administered by this state's department of military and veterans affairs. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5267(request no. H04348'25). (b) House Bill No. 5263(request no. H04349'25). (c) House Bill No. 5268 (request no. H04350'25). (d) House Bill No. ____ (request no. H04352'25).